Massachusetts, session 194th, H1003.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 2A the
following section:-
Section 2B. (a) There shall be within the office a drought management task force. The
task force shall consist of: the secretary or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the director of
the Massachusetts emergency management agency or a designee, who shall serve as co-chair; the
commissioner of agricultural resources or a designee; the commissioner of conservation and
recreation or a designee; the commissioner of environmental protection or a designee; the state
fire marshal or a designee; the commissioner of fish and game or a designee; the commissioner
of public health or a designee; the commissioner of public utilities or a designee; the executive
director of the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority or a designee; the executive director of
the Massachusetts Association of Health Boards, Inc.; the executive director of the
Massachusetts Rivers Alliance, Inc., or a designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts
of 3

Water Works Association Inc.; and the executive director of the Water Supply Citizens advisory
committee to the Massachusetts Water Resources Authority. The co-chairs may invite officials
from federal agencies to provide scientific and technical input and shall have joint responsibility
for coordinating the task force. The task force shall meet not less than monthly when drought
conditions exist. The task force shall be staffed by a director appointed by the secretary.
(b) The task force shall: (i) assist in collecting and assessing technical information; (ii)
facilitate coordination and communication among task force members, agencies and the public;
and (iii) provide recommendations to the secretary, the secretary of public safety and security
and the governor on the existing drought level and any proposed responses to such drought level.
The task force shall also make recommendations for the end of a drought or the reduction of the
drought level or for the commencement or cessation of a drought declaration.
(c) The task force shall maintain and periodically update a statewide drought
management plan that addresses drought preparedness and response protocol to drought
conditions and protects public health, public safety and the environment. The task force may
update the statewide drought management plan at any time; provided, however, that the plan
shall be reviewed not less than every 5 years and updated not less than every 10 years; provided
further, that the drought management plan shall be approved by the water resources commission.
(d) The task force may create and maintain a map that shall seek to create drought regions
consistent with watersheds.
(e) The secretary may order water conservation measures, including limits on
nonessential outdoor water use, based on the severity of drought in drought regions to protect
public health, safety or the environment. Such water conservation measures shall apply to all
of 3

water users within a drought region unless otherwise determined by the secretary with prior
notice to the task force.
(f) Notwithstanding section 27C of chapter 29 or any other general or special law,
ordinance, by-law, rule or regulation to the contrary, cities and towns shall enforce water
conservation restrictions issued by the secretary to the fullest extent permitted by law.
of 3